test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbAux_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# The auxiliaries liehket, årråt and ij,  from lexicon LIEHKET, ÅRROT, NEG

Tests:
  Verb - liehket: # LIEHKET
    liehket+V+IV+Inf: liehket
    liehket+V+IV+Sup: []
    liehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: [læhkám, lähkám]
    liehket+V+IV+Ger: []
    liehket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: liehkemin
    liehket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: liehkemis
    liehket+V+IV+VAbess: []
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [lev, lav]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [la, le]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lihpit
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: li
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lidjiv
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lidji
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [lej, lij]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: lijma
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: lijda
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lidjin
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: liege
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [læhkop, lähkop]
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: liehkit
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: liehkisa
    liehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Du2: lehkuda
    liehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Du3: lehkuska
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg1: littjav
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg2: littja
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [lisj, lesj]
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Prs+Pl3: littji
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: luluv
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: lulu
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Du2: lulujda
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: lulun

  Verb - årrot: # ÅRROT
    årrot+V+IV+Inf: årrot
    årrot+V+IV+Sup: [årotjit, årutjit]
    årrot+V+IV+PrfPrc: årrum
    årrot+V+IV+PrsPrc: årro
    årrot+V+IV+Ger: årodijn
    årrot+V+IV+Actio+Ess: årromin
    årrot+V+IV+Actio+Ela: årromis
    årrot+V+IV+VAbess: årok
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: årov
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: åro
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: årrobihtit
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: årru
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: årruv
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: årru
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: åroj
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: årojma
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: årojda
    årrot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: årrun
    årrot+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: åro
    årrot+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: årrop
    årrot+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: årrut
    årrot+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: årrusa
    årrot+V+IV+ImprtII+Du2: årruda
    årrot+V+IV+ImprtII+Du3: årruska
    årrot+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: årotjav
    årrot+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: årotja
    årrot+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: årosj
    årrot+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: årotji
    årrot+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [åroduvvá]

  Verb - ij: # NEG
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iv
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2: i
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ehpit
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3: e
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ittjiv
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ittji
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ittjij
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du1: ejma
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du2: ejda
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du3: ejga
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Imprt+Sg2: ale
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Imprt+Pl1: allop
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Imprt+Pl2: allit
    ij+V+IV+Neg+Imprt+Pl3: allisa
    ij+V+IV+Neg+ImprtII+Du2: alluda
    ij+V+IV+Neg+ImprtII+Du3: alluska
